Maryland, session 2025, SB0990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 15A OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 15A. AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT WARRANTY ENFORCEMENT ACT.
14–15A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT” MEANS ANY SELF–PROPELLED VEHICLE
DESIGNED PRIMARILY FOR AND USED IN THE OCCUPATION OR BUSINESS OF
FARMING.
(C) “CONSUMER” MEANS:
(1) THE PURCHASER OF NEW AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT OTHER
THAN FOR PURPOSES OF RESALE;
(2) A PERSON TO WHOM NEW AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT IS
TRANSFERRED DURING THE DURATION OF THE WARRANTY APPLICABLE TO THE
AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT; OR
(3) ANY OTHER PERSON WHO IS ENTITLED TO ENFORCE THE
OBLIGATIONS OF THE WARRANTY.
(D) “MANUFACTURER, FACTORY BRANCH, OR AUTHORIZED DEALER”
MEANS A PERSON ENGAGED IN THE BUSINESS OF MANUFACTURING, ASSEMBLING,
OR DEALING AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT, AS APPLICABLE.

SENATE BILL 990 3
(E) “WARRANTY” INCLUDES A WARRANTY AS DESCRIBED IN §§ 2–312
THROUGH 2–315 OF THIS ARTICLE, AS APPLICABLE.
(F) “WARRANTY PERIOD” MEANS THE LATER OF:
(1) THE PERIOD OF TIME STATED UNDER THE TERMS OF AN EXPRESS
WRITTEN WARRANTY; OR
(2) THE FIRST YEAR IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE ORIGINAL DATE
OF DELIVERY OF THE EQUIPMENT TO THE FIRST CONSUMER.
14–15A–02.
(A) (1) (I) IF AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT DOES NOT CONFORM TO ALL
APPLICABLE WARRANTIES DURING THE WARRANTY PERIOD, THE CONSUMER,
DURING THE WARRANTY PERIOD, SHALL REPORT THE NONCONFORMITY, DEFECT,
OR CONDITION BY PROVIDING WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE MANUFACTURER OR
FACTORY BRANCH BY CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED.
(II) NOTICE OF THE REQUIREMENT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSED TO THE CONSUMER IN
WRITING AT THE TIME OF SALE OR DELIVERY OF THE AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT.
(2) THE CONSUMER SHALL PROVIDE AN OPPORTUNITY FOR THE
MANUFACTURER OR FACTORY BRANCH OR ITS AGENT TO CORRECT THE
NONCONFORMITY, DEFECT, OR CONDITION.
(3) THE MANUFACTURER OR FACTORY BRANCH, ITS AGENT, OR ITS
AUTHORIZED DEALER SHALL CORRECT THE NONCONFORMITY, DEFECT, OR
CONDITION:
(I) AT NO CHARGE TO THE CONSUMER REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE REPAIRS ARE MADE AFTER THE EXPIRATION OF THE WARRANTY
PERIOD; AND
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE MANUFACTURER’S OR
FACTORY DEALER’S RECEIPT OF THE CONSUMER’S NOTIFICATION OF THE
NONCONFORMITY, DEFECT, OR CONDITION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, IF, AFTER A
REASONABLE NUMBER OF ATTEMPTS, THE MANUFACTURER OR FACTORY BRANCH,

SENATE BILL 990
ITS AGENT, OR ITS AUTHORIZED DEALER IS UNABLE TO REPAIR OR CORRECT ANY
DEFECT OR CONDITION THAT SUBSTANTIALLY IMPAIRS THE USE AND MARKET
VALUE OF THE AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT TO THE CONSUMER, THE
MANUFACTURER OR FACTORY BRANCH, AT THE OPTION OF THE CONSUMER, SHALL:
(I) REPLACE THE AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT WITH
COMPARABLE AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT THAT IS ACCEPTABLE TO THE
CONSUMER; OR
(II) ACCEPT RETURN OF THE AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT
FROM THE CONSUMER AND REFUND TO THE CONSUMER THE FULL PURCHASE PRICE
INCLUDING ALL LICENSE FEES, REGISTRATION FEES, AND ANY SIMILAR
GOVERNMENTAL CHARGES, LESS A REASONABLE ALLOWANCE FOR:
1. THE CONSUMER’S USE OF THE EQUIPMENT NOT TO
EXCEED 15% OF THE PURCHASE PRICE; AND
2. DAMAGE THAT IS NOT ATTRIBUTABLE TO NORMAL
WEAR OR A NONCONFORMITY, DEFECT, OR CONDITION.
(2) THE MANUFACTURER OR FACTORY BRANCH SHALL MAKE
REFUNDS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE CONSUMER AND
LIENHOLDER, IF ANY, AS THEIR INTERESTS APPEAR.
(3) IT IS AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE TO A CLAIM UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT THE NONCONFORMITY, DEFECT, OR CONDITION:
(I) DOES NOT SUBSTANTIALLY IMPAIR THE USE AND MARKET
VALUE OF THE AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT; OR
(II) IS THE RESULT OF ABUSE, NEGLECT, OR UNAUTHORIZED
MODIFICATIONS OR ALTERATIONS OF THE AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT.
(C) (1) IT SHALL BE PRESUMED THAT A REASONABLE NUMBER OF
ATTEMPTS HAVE BEEN MADE TO CONFORM AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT TO THE
APPLICABLE WARRANTIES IF:
(I) THE SAME NONCONFORMITY, DEFECT, OR CONDITION HAS
BEEN SUBJECT TO REPAIR FOUR OR MORE TIMES BY THE MANUFACTURER OR
FACTORY BRANCH OR ITS AGENTS OR AUTHORIZED DEALERS WITHIN THE
WARRANTY PERIOD, BUT THE NONCONFORMITY, DEFECT, OR CONDITION
CONTINUES TO EXIST; OR

SENATE BILL 990 5
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT IS OUT OF SERVICE FOR A CUMULATIVE TOTAL OF 30
OR MORE CALENDAR DAYS DURING THE WARRANTY PERIOD DUE TO THE REPAIR OR
ATTEMPTED REPAIR OF ONE OR MORE NONCONFORMITIES, DEFECTS, OR
CONDITIONS.
(2) THE 30–DAY PERIOD DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF
THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT INCLUDE A DAY ON WHICH A CONSUMER HAS BEEN
OFFERED OR PROVIDED BY A MANUFACTURER OR FACTORY BRANCH OR ITS
AUTHORIZED DEALERS WITH THE USE OF OTHER AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT THAT
PERFORMS THE SAME FUNCTION AS THE CONSUMER’S AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT
BEING REPAIRED.
(D) THE TERM OF A WARRANTY, THE WARRANTY PERIOD, AND THE 30–DAY
OUT–OF–SERVICE PERIOD DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1)(II) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL BE EXTENDED BY ANY TIME DURING WHICH REPAIR SERVICES ARE
NOT AVAILABLE TO THE CONSUMER BY REASON OF WAR, INVASION, STRIKE, OR
FIRE, FLOOD, OR OTHER NATURAL DISASTER.
(E) THE PRESUMPTION DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION DOES NOT APPLY AGAINST A MANUFACTURER IF THE MANUFACTURER HAS
NOT BEEN PROVIDED BY THE CONSUMER:
(1) PRIOR DIRECT WRITTEN NOTIFICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) THE OPPORTUNITY TO CORRECT THE ALLEGED
NONCONFORMITY, DEFECT, OR CONDITION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(A)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A CONSUMER
WHO SUFFERS A LOSS BECAUSE OF A VIOLATION OF A PROVISION OF THIS SECTION
MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION TO ENFORCE THE PROVISION.
(2) AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE COMMENCED NOT LATER THAN:
(I) 6 MONTHS AFTER THE EXPIRATION OF THE EXPRESSLY
WRITTEN WARRANTY TERM; OR
(II) 24 MONTHS AFTER THE DATE OF ORIGINAL DELIVERY OF
THE AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT TO THE CONSUMER.

SENATE BILL 990
14–15A–03.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT OR IMPAIR A RIGHT OR
REMEDY THAT IS OTHERWISE AVAILABLE TO A CONSUMER UNDER ANY OTHER LAW.
14–15A–04.
(A) A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE PENALTY AND ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER REMEDIES THAT MAY BE AVAILABLE UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE, IF A MANUFACTURER OR FACTORY BRANCH OR ITS AGENT OR
AUTHORIZED DISTRIBUTOR IS FOUND TO HAVE ACTED IN BAD FAITH, THE COURT
MAY AWARD THE CONSUMER DAMAGES OF UP TO $10,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any agricultural equipment, as defined in § 14–15A–01 of the Commercial
Law Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, purchased before the effective date of this
Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.